Oklahoma, session 2025, SB489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 20j, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 20j. A. The Attorney General is authorized and


directed to negotiate the terms of a Memorandum of Understanding


between the State of Oklahoma and the United States Department of


Justice or the United States Department of Homeland Security, as


provided by Section 1357(g) of Title 8 of the United States Code,


concerning the enforcement of federal immigration and customs laws,


detention and removals, and investigations in the State of Oklahoma


this state.

Req. No. 1556 Page 1


B. The Memorandum of Understanding negotiated pursuant to


subsection A of this section shall be signed on behalf of this state


by the Attorney General and the Governor or as otherwise required by


the appropriate federal agency.


C. No political subdivision or agency of the state or any local


government, whether acting through its governing body or by an


initiative, referendum, or any other process, shall enact or adopt


any ordinance, sanctuary policy, or other policy that limits or


prohibits a law enforcement officer, local government official, or


local government employee from communicating or cooperating with


federal officials with regard to the immigration status of any


person within this state. For the purposes of this section,


“sanctuary policy” includes, but is not limited to, any ordinance or


policy that:


1. Restricts or imposes conditions on compliance with a


detainer or other request from United States Immigration and Customs


Enforcement to maintain custody of an undocumented alien or to


transfer custody of an undocumented alien to the United States


Immigration and Customs Enforcement;


2. Requires United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement


to obtain a warrant or court order before compliance with a detainer


or other request;


3. Prevents a law enforcement officer from inquiries to a


person about his or her immigration status when specific and

Req. No. 1556 Page 2


articulable facts support probable cause that the person is an


undocumented alien; or


4. Knowingly provides special benefits, privileges, or support


to an undocumented alien.


D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no government


entity or official within the State of Oklahoma this state may


prohibit, or in any way restrict, any government entity or official


from sending to, or receiving from, the United States Department of


Homeland Security, information regarding the citizenship or


immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any individual.


E. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person or


agency may prohibit, or in any way restrict, a public employee from


doing any of the following with respect to information regarding the


immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any individual:


1. Sending such information to, or requesting or receiving such


information from, the United States Department of Homeland Security;


2. Maintaining such information; or


3. Exchanging such information with any other federal, state,


or local government entity.


F. Upon request for an opinion pursuant to paragraph 5 of


subsection A of Section 18b of this title, the Attorney General


shall determine whether an ordinance or policy is in violation of


this section. A political subdivision or agency of the state or any


local government that enacts or adopts any ordinance, sanctuary

Req. No. 1556 Page 3


policy, or other policy in violation of this section shall be


ineligible to receive any state appropriation or funding through a


grant administered by any state agency or department until such


ordinance or policy is repealed or no longer in effect.


G. The provisions of this section shall allow for a private


right of action by any natural or legal person lawfully domiciled in


this state to file for a writ of mandamus to compel any


noncooperating local or state governmental agency or political


subdivision to comply with such reporting laws.


H. An elected or appointed official who willfully violates the


provisions of this section shall be subject to removal for official


misconduct pursuant to Section 93 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1556 TEK 1/19/2025 5:37:23 AM

















Req. No. 1556 Page 4